District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.52

Criteria for closing capital projects.

(a)

For any capital project funded from revenues in the Local Transportation Fund, the CFO, in consultation with the Mayor, may close the project if the project:

(1)

Has obligated or expended funds in excess of its approved budget; or

(2)

Has been inactive for 12 months or longer.

(b)

For any capital project funded from revenues in the District of Columbia Highway Trust Fund, the CFO, in consultation with the Mayor and the Federal Highway Administration Division, may close the project if the project:

(1)

Has been closed by the United States Department of Transportation;

(2)

Has an open balance of:

(A)

$500,000 or more, and has been inactive for 12 months;

(B)

Between $50,000 and $499,999, and has been inactive for 24 months; or

(C)

Less than $50,000, and has been inactive for 36 months; or

(3)

Has obligated or expended funds in excess of its approved budget.

(c)

If a capital project has a budget allotment in excess of its budget authority, the CFO, in consultation with the Mayor, may adjust the allotment to align it with the correct budget authority.

(d)

The CFO may delegate the authority granted to him or her by this section to the Director of Capital Programs.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11i [11j]
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 9002, 59 DCR 8025

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-921.53.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.

Editor's Notes

Section 11h of D.C. Law 14-137, as added as added by D.C. Law 19-168, § 3012, is codified as § 50-921.51.